Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-1921
Confidential information and confidential records; access; sharing; restrictions; grounds for dismissal.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office shall have access to confidential information and confidential records necessary to carry out its responsibilities.

(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, any confidential information or confidential records shared with the office shall remain confidential and shall not be shared by an employee of the office with any person who is not an employee of the office, including any member of the Legislative Oversight Committee.

(3) If any employee of the office knowingly divulges or makes known, in any manner not permitted by law, confidential information or confidential records, it shall be grounds for dismissal.

Laws 2025, LB298, § 65.